Washington statutes.
RCW 18.57.160

Unlawful practices.

Every person falsely claiming himself or herself to be the person named in a certificate issued to another, or falsely claiming himself or herself to be the person entitled to the same, is guilty of forgery under RCW 9A.60.020.

[ 2003 c 53 s 131; 1981 c 277 s 9; 1919 c 4 s 15; RRS s 10067. Cf. 1909 c 192 s 15.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.

Forgery: RCW 9A.60.020.